Utah statutes.
38-1-5.   Priority -- Over other encumbrances.
The liens herein provided for shall relate back to, and take effect as of, the
time of the commencement to do work or furnish materials on the ground for the
structure or improvement, and shall have priority over any lien, mortgage or
other encumbrance which may have attached subsequently to the time when the
building, improvement or structure was commenced, work begun, or first
material furnished on the ground; also over any lien, mortgage or other
encumbrance of which the lien holder had no notice and which was unrecorded at
the time the building, structure or improvement was commenced, work begun, or
first material furnished on the ground.
